Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.792, is amended to read: 124D.792 GRADUATION CEREMONIES; TRIBAL REGALIA AND OBJECTS OF CULTURAL SIGNIFICANCEnew text begin ; DRUMMINGnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end A school district or charter school must not prohibit an American Indian student from wearing American Indian regalia, Tribal regalia, or objects of cultural significance at a graduation ceremony. new text begin (b) If requested by the school's American Indian parent committee or an American Indian student organization, a school district or charter school must allow American Indian drumming at a graduation ceremony. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [124D.793] AMERICAN INDIAN DRUMMING. new text end new text begin If requested by the school's American Indian parent committee, a school district or charter school must allow American Indian drumming. new text end